Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Law Enforcement Foundation Program Fund

15.410.
Intention of Legislature to assist law enforcement.

It is the intention of the General Assembly to:

Ensure that the criminal laws of the Commonwealth are enforced fairly, uniformly, and effectively throughout the state by strengthening and upgrading law enforcement;

Attract competent, highly qualified young people to the field of law enforcement and to retain qualified and experienced officers for the purpose of providing maximum protection and safety to the citizens of, and the visitors to, this Commonwealth; and

Offer a state monetary supplement for law enforcement officers while upgrading the educational and training standards of the officers.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 71, § 1; 2018 ch. 89, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

15.420.
Definitions for KRS 15.410 to 15.510.

As used in KRS

15.410

to

15.510

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Cabinet” means the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet;

“Police officer” means:

A local officer, limited to:

A full-time:

Member of a lawfully organized police department of county, urban-county, or city government; or

Sheriff or full-time deputy sheriff, including any sheriff providing court security or appointed under KRS

70.030

;

A school resource officer as defined in KRS

158.441

; or

One (1) of the following who is otherwise eligible for an annual supplement established in accordance with KRS

15.460

, but who does not receive one:

An officer serving on a joint task force;

A detective employed by a county attorney;

A process server for juvenile courts within a consolidated local government; and

A local alcoholic beverage control investigator appointed pursuant to KRS Chapter 241; and

A state officer, limited to:

A public university police officer;

A Kentucky state trooper;

A Kentucky State Police arson investigator;

A Kentucky State Police hazardous device investigator;

A Kentucky State Police legislative security specialist;

A Kentucky vehicle enforcement officer;

A Kentucky Horse Park mounted patrol officer, subject to KRS

15.460

(1)(f);

A Kentucky state park ranger, subject to KRS 15.460(1)(f);

An agriculture investigator;

A charitable gaming investigator;

An alcoholic beverage control investigator;

An insurance fraud investigator;

An Attorney General investigator;

A Kentucky Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources conservation officer, subject to KRS 15.460(1)(e); and

Any detective for a Commonwealth’s attorney who would otherwise be eligible for a supplement established in accordance with KRS 15.460, but who does not receive one;

who is responsible for the prevention and detection of crime and the enforcement of the general criminal laws of the state;

“Police officer” does not include any sheriff who earns the maximum constitutional salary for this office, any special deputy sheriff appointed under KRS

70.045

, any constable, deputy constable, district detective, deputy district detective, special local peace officer, auxiliary police officer, or any other peace officer not specifically authorized in KRS

15.410

to

15.510

;

“Police department” means the employer of a police officer;

“Retirement plan” means a defined benefit plan consisting of required employer contributions pursuant to KRS

61.565

,

61.702

, or any other provision of law;

“Unit of government” means any city, county, combination of cities and counties, public university, state agency, local school district, or county sheriff’s office of the Commonwealth; and

“Validated job task analysis” means the core job description that describes the minimum entry level requirements, qualifications, and training requirements for peace officers in the Commonwealth, and that is based upon an actual survey and study of police officer duties and responsibilities conducted by an entity recognized by the council as being competent to conduct such a study.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 71, § 2; 1984, ch. 300, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 1998, ch. 244, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 510, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 606, § 55, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 85, § 22, effective June 26, 2007; 2018 ch. 89, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 5, § 9, effective March 11, 2019; 2022 ch. 231, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

15.430.
Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund — Funds accruing under KRS 42.190 and 136.392 — Trust and agency fund.

There is hereby established the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund consisting of appropriations from the general fund of the Commonwealth of Kentucky and insurance premium surcharge proceeds that accrue to this fund pursuant to KRS

42.190

and

136.392

. Any other funds, gifts, or grants made available to the state for distribution to units of government in accordance with the provisions of KRS

15.410

to

15.510

also shall be made a part of this fund.

All moneys deposited in this fund, including earnings from their investment, shall be deemed a trust and agency account. Moneys in this account shall not lapse.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 71, § 3; 1982, ch. 246, § 8, effective April 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 300, § 5, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 381, § 12, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 97, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 244, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 510, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2018 ch. 89, § 3, effective July 1, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/98). This section was amended by 1998 Ky. Acts ch. 244, sec. 7, and ch. 510, sec. 7, which are identical and have been codified together.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. V, B, 1 at 1757.

15.440.
Requirements for participation in fund distribution — Service and training in another state — Eligibility of government unit contingent on police department compliance — Deputies — Deadlines.

Each unit of government that meets the following requirements shall be eligible to share in the distribution of funds from the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund:

Employs one (1) or more police officers;

Pays every police officer at least the minimum federal wage;

Requires all police officers to have, at a minimum, a high school degree, or its equivalent as determined by the council, except that each police officer employed prior to the date on which the officer’s police department was included as a participant under KRS

15.410

to

15.510

shall be deemed to have met the requirements of this subsection;

Requires all police officers to successfully complete a basic training course of nine hundred twenty-eight (928) hours’ duration within one (1) year of the date of employment at a school certified or recognized by the council, which may provide a different number of hours of instruction as established in this paragraph, except that each police officer employed prior to the date on which the officer’s police department was included as a participant under KRS

15.410

to

15.510

shall be deemed to have met the requirements of this subsection.

As the exclusive method by which the number of hours required for basic training courses shall be modified from that which is specifically established by this paragraph, the council may, by the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A, explicitly set the exact number of hours for basic training at a number different from nine hundred twenty-eight (928) hours based upon a training curriculum approved by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council as determined by a validated job task analysis.

If the council sets an exact number of hours different from nine hundred twenty-eight (928) in an administrative regulation as provided by this paragraph, it shall not further change the number of hours required for basic training without promulgating administrative regulations in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A.

Nothing in this paragraph shall be interpreted to prevent the council, pursuant to its authority under KRS

15.330

, from approving training schools with a curriculum requiring attendance of a number of hours that exceeds nine hundred twenty-eight (928) hours or the number of hours established in an administrative regulation as provided by subparagraphs 2. and 3. of this paragraph. However, the training programs and schools for the basic training of law enforcement personnel conducted by the department pursuant to KRS

15A.070

shall not contain a curriculum that requires attendance of a number of hours for basic training that is different from nine hundred twenty-eight (928) hours or the number of hours established in an administrative regulation promulgated by the council pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A as provided by subparagraphs 2. and 3. of this paragraph.

KRS

15.400

and 15.404(1) and subparagraphs 1. to 4. of this paragraph to the contrary notwithstanding, the council may, through the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, approve basic training credit for:

Years of service credit as a law enforcement officer with previous service in another state; and

Basic training completed in another state.

KRS

15.400

and 15.404(1) and subparagraphs 1. to 4. of this paragraph to the contrary notwithstanding, the council may, through the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, approve basic training credit for:

Completion of eight hundred forty-eight (848) hours of training at a school established pursuant to KRS

15A.070

;

A minimum of fifteen (15) years of experience as a certified law enforcement instructor at a school established pursuant to KRS 15A.070;

Completion of an average of forty (40) hours of Kentucky Law Enforcement Council approved in-service training annually from January 1, 1997, through January 1, 2020;

Three (3) years of active, full-time service as a:

City, county, urban-county, charter county, consolidated local, or unified local government police officer;

Sheriff’s deputy, excluding special deputies appointed under KRS

70.045

;

Department of Kentucky State Police officer; or

Kentucky Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources conservation officer exercising peace officer powers under KRS

150.090

; and

Completion of the:

Twenty-four (24) hour legal update Penal Code course;

Sixteen (16) hour legal update constitutional procedure course; and

Forty (40) hour basic officer skills course within one (1) year prior to applying for certification;

Requires all police officers to successfully complete each calendar year an in-service training course, appropriate to the officer’s rank and responsibility and the size and location of the officer’s police department, of forty (40) hours’ duration, at a school certified or recognized by the council which may include a four (4) hour course which meets the requirements of paragraph (j) of this subsection. This in-service training requirement shall be waived for the period of time that a peace officer is serving on active duty in the United States Armed Forces. This waiver shall be retroactive for peace officers from the date of September 11, 2001;

Complies with all provisions of law applicable to police officers or police departments, including transmission of data to the centralized criminal history record information system as required by KRS

17.150

and transmission of reports as required by KRS

15.391

;

Complies with all rules and regulations, appropriate to the size and location of the police department issued by the cabinet to facilitate the administration of the fund and further the purposes of KRS 15.410 to 15.510;

Possesses a written policy and procedures manual related to domestic violence for law enforcement agencies that has been approved by the cabinet. The policy shall comply with the provisions of KRS

403.715

to

403.785

. The policy shall include a purpose statement; definitions; supervisory responsibilities; procedures for twenty-four (24) hour access to protective orders; procedures for enforcement of court orders or relief when protective orders are violated; procedures for timely and contemporaneous reporting of adult abuse and domestic violence to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, Department for Community Based Services; victim rights, assistance, and service responsibilities; and duties related to timely completion of records;

Possesses by January 1, 2023, a written policy and procedures manual related to sexual assault examinations that meets the standards provided by, and has been approved by, the cabinet, and which includes:

A requirement that evidence collected as a result of an examination performed under KRS

216B.400

be taken into custody within five (5) days of notice from the collecting facility that the evidence is available for retrieval;

A requirement that evidence received from a collecting facility relating to an incident which occurred outside the jurisdiction of the police department be transmitted to a police department with jurisdiction within ten (10) days of its receipt by the police department;

A requirement that all evidence retrieved from a collecting facility under this paragraph be transmitted to the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory within thirty (30) days of its receipt by the police department;

A requirement that a suspect standard, if available, be transmitted to the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory with the evidence received from a collecting facility;

A process for notifying the victim from whom the evidence was collected of the progress of the testing, whether the testing resulted in a match to other DNA samples, and if the evidence is to be destroyed. The policy may include provisions for delaying notice until a suspect is apprehended or the office of the Commonwealth’s attorney consents to the notification, but shall not automatically require the disclosure of the identity of any person to whom the evidence matched; and

A requirement that DNA samples collected as a result of an examination performed under KRS

216B.400

that are voluntarily submitted solely for elimination purposes shall not be checked against any DNA index, retained, or included in any DNA index; and

Requires all police officers to successfully complete by December 31, 2022, and every two (2) years thereafter, a training course certified by the council of not less than four (4) hours in emergency vehicle operation.

A unit of government which meets the criteria of this section shall be eligible to continue sharing in the distribution of funds from the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund only if the police department of the unit of government remains in compliance with the requirements of this section.

Deputies employed by a sheriff’s office shall be eligible to participate in the distribution of funds from the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund regardless of participation by the sheriff.

Failure to meet a deadline established in a policy adopted pursuant to subsection (1)(i) of this section for the retrieval or submission of evidence shall not be a basis for a dismissal of a criminal action or a bar to the admissibility of the evidence in a criminal action.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 71, § 4; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(10); 1976, ch. 105, § 1; 1998, ch. 244, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 510, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 606, § 120, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 480, § 9, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 137, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 106, § 2, effective June 24, 2003; 2007, ch. 85, § 23, effective June 26, 2007; 2016 ch. 58, § 2, effective April 8, 2016; 2016 ch. 112, § 2, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 58, § 2, effective March 21, 2017; 2018 ch. 89, § 4, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 95, § 3, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 97, § 2, effective July 15, 2020; 2020 ch. 124, § 2, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 73, § 5, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 169, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/8/2016).
2016 Ky. Acts ch. 58, sec. 11 provided that Act shall be known as the Sexual Assault Forensic Evidence (SAFE) Act of 2016. This statute was amended in Section 2 of that Act.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Although two cities have entered into an interlocal agreement with a police authority, such agreement could be mutually dissolved by the cities at any time and no binding effect would result from the contract and any contract between the Kentucky Crime Commission (now Justice Cabinet) through the Kentucky Law Enforcement Foundation Fund would need to be entered into with the actual subdivisions involved.

OAG 73-603

.

A city’s participation or lack of it in the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund is not going to change the legal status of the city’s police officers appointed pursuant to KRS

95.700

(repealed).

OAG 77-459

.

The AIDS training requirement of former KRS

15.333

(now repealed) is incorporated into the training required by subdivisions (4) and (5) (see now (1)(d) and (e)) of this section so that a local unit of government, in order to be eligible to participate in the Kentucky Law Enforcement Foundation Program Fund, must require all its police officers, as defined in KRS 15.420(2), to meet the AIDS training requirement.

OAG 91-61

.

To retain eligibility relative to participation in the Kentucky Law Enforcement Foundation Program Fund, a police department’s officers must receive the annual training required by KRS

15.333

.

OAG 91-61

.

Research References and Practice Aids

2012-2014 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2010 (1st Extra. Sess.) Ky. Acts ch. 1, Pt. I, H, 2, (3) at 42.

15.442.
Court security officers and fire investigators ineligible to participate in fund — Appointment of court security officer does not affect eligibility of sheriff or deputy sheriffs.

A court security officer certified pursuant to KRS

15.380

to

15.404

shall not be a deputy sheriff.

A court security officer certified or a fire investigator certified as a peace officer pursuant to KRS

15.380

to

15.404

shall not be eligible for inclusion in the Kentucky Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund.

The appointment of a court security officer, whether certified or not, by a sheriff shall not affect the ability of the sheriff or certified deputy sheriffs to participate in the Kentucky Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund if all other requirements for participation in the fund under KRS

15.410

to

15.510

have been met. A sheriff or deputy sheriff who is otherwise eligible under KRS

15.410

to

15.510

for participation in the Kentucky Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund shall not be deemed ineligible because of the appointment of a court security officer by the sheriff or by any other body.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 54, § 15, effective June 26, 2007; 2018 ch. 128, § 5, effective January 1, 2019.

15.450.
Fund administered by secretary — Administrative regulations — Reimbursement of administrative costs — Reports.

The secretary or his or her designated representative shall administer the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund pursuant to the provisions of KRS

15.410

to

15.510

and may promulgate any administrative regulations as necessary to carry out the responsibilities under KRS

15.410

to

15.510

. Administrative hearings promulgated by administrative regulation under authority of this section shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

The secretary or the designated representative may withhold or terminate payments to any unit of government that does not comply with the requirements of KRS

15.410

to

15.510

or the administrative regulations issued by the cabinet under KRS

15.410

to

15.510

.

The cabinet shall, from moneys appropriated and accruing to the fund as provided under KRS

15.430

, receive reimbursement for the salaries and other costs of administering the fund, including but not limited to, council operations and expenses and the salary and associated operating expenses of the office of the state school security marshal. The amount to be reimbursed for any given year shall be determined by the council and shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the total amount of funds for that year.

The cabinet shall furnish periodically to the council any reports as may be deemed reasonably necessary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 71, § 5; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 34; 1984, ch. 300, § 6, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 318, § 16, effective July 15, 1996; 2007, ch. 85, § 24, effective June 26, 2007; 2018 ch. 89, § 5, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 5, § 10, effective March 11, 2019.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 2, (3) at 1683.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 2, (7) at 1638.

15.455.
Certification of program cost projections to Finance and Administration Cabinet.

Upon receipt of a written request by the Finance and Administration Cabinet for cost projections of the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund as prescribed in KRS

42.190

, the administrator of the fund shall, within twenty-one (21) calendar days, certify in writing said projections to the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 246, § 3, effective April 1, 1982.

15.460.
Supplemental payments and retirement contributions to local governments from fund — Administrative expense reimbursement — Fringe benefit costs — Conservation officers and Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet peace officers — Supplements to qualified police officers, sheriffs, and deputy sheriffs — Receipt of supplements during period of military activation — Due process disciplinary procedures.

Except as provided in subsection (4)(a) of this section, an eligible unit of government shall be entitled to receive an annual supplement of three thousand dollars ($3,000) for each qualified police officer it employs. The supplement amount shall be increased to four thousand dollars ($4,000) beginning July 1, 2018.

In addition to the supplement, the unit of government shall receive an amount equal to the required employer’s contribution on the supplement to the retirement plan and duty category to which the officer belongs. In the case of County Employees Retirement System membership, the retirement plan contribution on the supplement shall be paid whether the officer enters the system under hazardous duty coverage or nonhazardous coverage.

The unit of government shall pay the amount received for retirement plan coverage to the appropriate retirement system to cover the required employer contribution on the pay supplement.

If the foundation program funds are insufficient to pay employer contributions to the system, then the total amount available for retirement plan payments shall be prorated to each eligible government so that each receives the same percentage of required retirement plan costs attributable to the cash salary supplement.

In addition to the payments received under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, but only if sufficient funds are available to make all payments required under paragraph (b) of this subsection, each unit of government shall receive an administrative expense reimbursement in an amount equal to seven and sixty-five one-hundredths percent (7.65%) of the total annual supplement received greater than three thousand one hundred dollars ($3,100) for each qualified police officer that is a local officer as defined in KRS

15.420

(2)(a)1. that it employs, subject to the cap established by subparagraph 3. of this paragraph.

The unit of government may use the moneys received under this paragraph in any manner it deems necessary to partially cover the costs of administering the payments received under paragraph (a) of this subsection.

The total amount distributed under this paragraph shall not exceed the total sum of five hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($525,000) for each fiscal year. If there are insufficient funds to provide for full reimbursement as provided in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, then the amount shall be distributed pro rata to each eligible unit of government so that each receives the same percentage attributable to its total receipt of the cash salary supplement.

In addition to the payments received under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, each unit of government shall receive the associated fringe benefits costs for the total supplement of four thousand dollars ($4,000) for each qualified police officer that is a state officer as defined in KRS

15.420

(2)(a)2. that it employs. Fringe benefits shall be limited to retirement plan contributions and the federal insurance contributions act tax.

Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection, a Kentucky Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources conservation officer appointed pursuant to KRS 150.090(2) and listed in KRS 15.420(2)(a)2.n. shall be a participant in the Kentucky Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund, but shall not receive an annual supplement from that fund. A conservation officer shall receive an annual training stipend commensurate to the annual supplement paid to the police officer as defined in KRS 15.420. The annual training stipend disbursed to a conservation officer shall be paid from the game and fish fund pursuant to KRS

150.150

.

Any peace officer sanctioned by the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet shall be deemed a police officer solely for the purpose of inclusion in the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund.

The supplement provided in subsection (1) of this section shall be paid by the unit of government to each police officer whose qualifications resulted in receipt of a supplemental payment. The payment shall be in addition to the police officer’s regular salary and, except as provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section, shall continue to be paid to a police officer who is a member of:

The Kentucky National Guard during any period of activation under Title 10 or 32 of the United States Code or KRS

38.030

; or

Any reserve component of the United States Armed Forces during any period of activation with the United States Armed Forces.

A qualified sheriff who receives the maximum salary allowed by Section 246 of the Kentucky Constitution and KRS

64.527

shall not receive a supplement.

A qualified sheriff who does not receive the maximum salary allowed by Section 246 of the Kentucky Constitution and KRS

64.527

, excluding the expense allowance provided by KRS

70.170

, shall upon annual settlement with the fiscal court under KRS

134.192

, receive that portion of the supplement that will not cause his or her compensation to exceed the maximum salary.

A qualified sheriff who seeks to participate in the fund shall forward a copy of the annual settlement prepared under KRS

134.192

to the fund. The sheriff shall reimburse the fund if an audit of the annual settlement conducted pursuant to KRS 134.192 reflects that the sheriff received all or a portion of the supplement in violation of this section. A sheriff who fails to provide a copy of the annual settlement to the fund or to reimburse the fund after correction by audit, if required, shall not be qualified to participate in the fund for a period of two (2) years.

A qualified deputy sheriff shall receive the supplement from the sheriff if the sheriff administers his or her own budget or from the county treasurer if the sheriff pools his or her fees. The failure of a sheriff to comply with the provisions of this section shall not affect the qualification of his or her deputies to participate in the fund.

Eligible units of government shall receive the salary supplement, excluding funds applicable to the employer’s retirement plan contribution, provided in subsection (1) of this section for distribution to a police officer who is eligible under subsection (2) of this section.

A qualified police officer receiving a salary supplement during any period of military activation, as provided in subsection (2) of this section, shall not be entitled to receive the employer’s retirement plan contribution, and the salary supplement shall not be subjected to an employee’s contribution to a retirement plan. The salary supplement shall otherwise be taxable for all purposes.

A unit of government receiving disbursements under this section shall follow all laws applicable to it that may govern due process disciplinary procedures for its officers, but this subsection shall not be interpreted to:

Authorize the department, the cabinet, or the council to investigate, judge, or exercise any control or jurisdiction regarding the compliance of a unit of government with laws that may govern due process disciplinary procedures for its officers, except as otherwise provided by laws;

Create a private right of action for any police officer regarding an agency’s participation in this section;

Authorize a termination of an agency’s participation as a result of a judgment that the unit of government failed to follow its procedures in any independent cause of action brought by the police officer against the unit of government; or

Prevent the adoption, amendment, or repeal of any laws that may govern the due process disciplinary procedures of a unit of government’s police officers.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 71, § 6; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(10); 1980, ch. 297, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 246, § 9, effective July 1, 1982; 1988, ch. 11, § 13, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 366, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 244, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 510, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 606, § 56, effective July 15, 1998; 2009, ch. 10, § 53, effective January 1, 2010; 2012, ch. 86, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2018 ch. 89, § 6, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 167, § 4, effective June 27, 2019.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/1/2018). An error in this statute has been corrected in codification. In the amendment to this statute in
2018 Ky. Acts ch. 89, sec. 6, subsection (1)(e) contains the phrase “police officer as defined in Section 1 of this Act.” Section 1 amends
KRS

15.410

, but no definition of the term “police officer” appears in that statute. It is clear from the context that the definition being referred to appears in Section 2 of the Act, which amends
KRS

15.420

. Under the authority of
KRS 7.136(1)(f) and (h), the Revisor of Statutes has corrected the reference to read “ KRS

15.420

.”

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 21, (9) at 1646.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 2, (2) at 1683.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 4, (11) at 1685.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, L, 4, (5) at 1704.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, L, 5, (2) at 1704.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, L, 7, (1) at 1705.

15.470.
Purposes for which funds may be used.

Law Enforcement Foundation Program funds made available to units of government shall be received, held, and expended in accordance with the provisions of KRS

15.410

to

15.510

, including the administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet and the following specific restrictions:

Funds provided shall be used only as a cash salary supplement to police officers, for payments to the retirement plan to which the officer belongs to cover employer retirement costs on the cash salary supplement, and for administrative costs as provided in KRS

15.450

;

Funds provided shall be used only to compensate police officers who have complied with KRS 15.440(1)(c), (d), and (e);

Each police officer shall be entitled to receive the state supplement that the officer’s qualifications brought to the unit of government;

Funds provided shall not be used to supplant existing salaries or as a substitute for normal salary increases periodically due to police officers;

Each police officer receiving the state supplement who is also a member of the Kentucky National Guard or any reserve component of the United States Armed Forces shall continue to receive the state supplement during any period of military activation, as provided in KRS 15.460(2); and

Funds distributed or received pursuant to subsection (5) of this section shall be excluded from all aspects of the Kentucky Retirement Systems or any other retirement system.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 71, § 7; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(10); 1984, ch. 300, § 7, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 11, § 14, effective July 15, 1988; 2002, ch. 137, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 25, effective June 26, 2007; 2012, ch. 86, § 2, effective July 12, 2012; 2018 ch. 89, § 7, effective July 1, 2018.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where the city of Louisville proposed a normal salary increase for its police officers but the United States Cost of Living Council ruled that the city could not pay any salary increase to its policemen during that year except for the 9.5 percent salary supplement payable by the state, the provision of this section providing that the salary supplement may not supplant the existing salaries or normal periodic pay increases would not prevent the payment of the supplement to the city for the salaries of its police officers, since the city’s failure to grant the normal periodic pay increase was caused not by any act of its own but by the order of the federal Cost of Living Council.

OAG 73-542

.

Research References and Practice Aids

2018-2020 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2018 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 2, (3a) at 1326.See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2018 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 2, (3b) at 1326.See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2018 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 2, (4a) at 1326.See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2018 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 2, (4b) at 1326.See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2018 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 2, (4c) at 1326.See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2018 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 2, (6) at 1326.

15.480.
Payment by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet, on the certification of the cabinet, shall draw warrants as specified hereinafter on the State Treasurer for the amount of the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund due each participating unit of government. Checks shall be issued by the State Treasurer and transmitted to the cabinet for distribution to the proper officials of participating units of government that have complied with the provisions of KRS

15.410

to

15.510

and the administrative regulations of the cabinet. On the first day of each month, the share of each eligible and participating unit of government shall be distributed from the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 71, § 8; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(10); 2007, ch. 85, § 26, effective June 26, 2007; 2018 ch. 89, § 8, effective July 1, 2018.

15.490.
Reports — Compensation as part of salary.

Each participating unit of government shall submit reports to the cabinet on March 31, June 30, September 30, and December 31 of each year containing information relative to number, rank, education, training, and compensation of police officers employed by it and the disposition made of any state or other funds received pursuant to KRS

15.410

to

15.510

. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the cabinet from requiring additional information or reports from participating units of government;

Units of government shall include the additional compensation paid to each police officer from the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund as a part of the officer’s salary in determining all payroll deductions.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 71, § 9; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(10); 2007, ch. 85, § 27, effective June 26, 2007; 2018 ch. 89, § 9, effective July 1, 2018.

15.500.
Distribution of insufficient funds — Unexpended funds.

If funds appropriated by the General Assembly and otherwise made available to the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund are insufficient to provide the amount of money required by KRS

15.460

, the cabinet shall establish the rate of assistance to be paid.

Funds unexpended by the cabinet at the close of the fiscal year for which the funds were appropriated and otherwise made available to this fund, pursuant to KRS

15.430

,

42.190

and

136.392

, shall not lapse as provided by KRS

45.229

but shall be carried forward into the following fiscal year and shall be used solely for the purposes specified in KRS

15.410

to

15.500

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 71, § 10; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(10); 1976, ch. 105, § 2; 1982, ch. 246, § 10, effective April 1, 1982; 1982, ch. 450, § 51, effective July 1, 1983; 1984, ch. 300, § 8, effective July 13, 1984; 2007, ch. 85, § 28, effective June 26, 2007; 2018 ch. 89, § 10, effective July 1, 2018.

15.510.
Appeals.

An appeal may be taken from any decision of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet to withhold or terminate payment from the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund to any local unit of government. Appeals shall be taken to the Circuit Court of the county where the controversy originates.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 71, § 11; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(10); 2007, ch. 85, § 29, effective June 26, 2007.

15.512.
Retention of records of officers having met KRS 15.440(1)(j) biennial training requirements.

Each law enforcement agency or other employing agency whose officers are required to meet the training requirements of KRS 15.440(1)(j) shall retain a record of each of its officers having met the biennial training. These records shall be made available upon request to the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council and to the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 97, § 4, effective July 15, 2020.